test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aeqbtwks_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - äʼbțõks: # Noun 208 'eng /est vahend/fin' - full paradigm
     äʼbțõks+N+Sg+Nom: [äʼbțõks, äbțõks]
     äʼbțõks+N+Sg+Gen: [äʼbțõks, äbțõks]
     äʼbțõks+N+Sg+Par: [äʼbțõkst, äbțõkst]
     äʼbțõks+N+Sg+Dat: [äʼbțõksõn, äbțõksõn]
     äʼbțõks+N+Sg+Ins: [äʼbțõksõks, äbțõksõks]
     äʼbțõks+N+Sg+Ill: [äʼbțõksõ, äbțõksõ]
     äʼbțõks+N+Sg+Ela: [äʼbțõksõst, äbțõksõst]
     äʼbțõks+N+Pl+Nom: [äʼbțõkst, äbțõkst]
     äʼbțõks+N+Pl+Gen: [äʼbțõkst, äbțõkst]
     äʼbțõks+N+Pl+Par: [äʼbțõkši, äbțõkši]
     äʼbțõks+N+Pl+Dat: [äʼbțõkstõn, äbțõkstõn]
     äʼbțõks+N+Pl+Ins: [äʼbțõkstõks, äbțõkstõks]
     äʼbțõks+N+Pl+Ill: [äʼbțõkšiz, äbțõkšiz]
     äʼbțõks+N+Pl+Ela: [äʼbțõkšist, äbțõkšist]
